Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.350

Agreement and order to define applicable area—"Production area"—"Marketing area."

Every marketing agreement and order shall define the area to which it applies which may be all or any contiguous portion of the state. Such area may be defined as a "production area" in which case such agreement or order shall regulate or apply with respect to all of the commodity specified in such agreement or order which is produced within such production area and sold, marketed or delivered for sale or marketing. Such area may be defined as a "marketing area" in which case such agreement or order shall regulate or apply with respect to all of the commodity specified in such agreement or order which is stored in frozen condition or sold or marketed or delivered for sale or marketing or distribution or processing or consumption within such marketing area.

[ 1985 c 261 s 12; 1961 c 256 s 35.]